Hawaii, session 2025, SB647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 249-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "moped" to read as follows: ""Moped" means a device upon which a person may ride that has: (1)  Two or three wheels in contact with the ground; (2)  A motor having a maximum power output capability measured at the motor output shaft, in accordance with SAE International standards, of two horsepower (one thousand four hundred ninety-two watts) or less and, if it is a combustion engine, a maximum piston or rotor displacement of 3.05 cubic inches (fifty cubic centimeters) and that will propel the device, unassisted, on a level surface at a maximum speed no greater than thirty miles per hour; and (3)  A direct or automatic power drive system that requires no clutch or gear shift operation by the moped driver after the drive system is engaged with the power unit. "Moped" does not include an electric foot scooter[.] or a low‑speed electric bicycle as defined under title 15 United States Code section 2085." SECTION 2.  Section 286-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending the definition of "moped" to read: ""Moped" means a device upon which a person may ride that has: (1)  Two or three wheels in contact with the ground; (2)  A motor having a maximum power output capability measured at the motor output shaft, in accordance with SAE International standards, of two horsepower (one thousand four hundred ninety-two watts) or less and, if it is a combustion engine, a maximum piston or rotor displacement of 3.05 cubic inches (fifty cubic centimeters) and that will propel the moped, unassisted, on a level surface at a maximum speed no greater than thirty miles per hour; and (3)  A direct or automatic power drive system that requires no clutch or gear shift operation by the moped driver after the drive system is engaged with the power unit. "Moped" does not include an electric foot scooter[.] or a low‑speed electric bicycle as defined under title 15 United States Code section 2085." 2.  By deleting the definition of "bicycle": [""Bicycle" means: (1)  A device propelled solely by human power upon which any person may ride, having two tandem wheels sixteen inches in diameter or greater, and including any device generally recognized as a bicycle though equipped with two front or two rear wheels; or (2)  A low-speed electric bicycle, as defined under title 15 United States Code section 2085."] SECTION 3. Section 291-21.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: "Motorized bicycle" does not include a low-speed electric bicycle as defined under title 15 United States Code section 2085." SECTION 4. Section 291C-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted and to read: ""Low-speed electric bicycle" has the same meaning as that provided in title 15 United States Code section 2085." 2.  By amending the definition of "bicycle" to read: ""Bicycle" means[: (1)  A] a vehicle propelled solely by human power upon which any person may ride, having two tandem wheels, and including any vehicle generally recognized as a bicycle though equipped with two front or two rear wheels except a toy bicycle[; or (2)  A low-speed electric bicycle, as defined under title 15 United States Code section 2085]." 3.  By amending the definition of "moped" to read: "Moped" means a device upon which a person may ride that has: (1)  Two or three wheels in contact with the ground; (2)  A motor having a maximum power output capability measured at the motor output shaft, in accordance with SAE International standards, of two horsepower (one thousand four hundred ninety-two watts) or less and, if it is a combustion engine, a maximum piston or rotor displacement of 3.05 cubic inches (fifty cubic centimeters) and that will propel the device, unassisted, on a level surface at a maximum speed no greater than thirty miles per hour; and (3)  A direct or automatic power drive system that requires no clutch or gear shift operation by the moped driver after the drive system is engaged with the power unit. "Moped" does not include an electric foot scooter[.] or a low‑speed electric bicycle." SECTION 5. Section 291C-141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c)  [These] Except as otherwise provided in section 291C‑143.5, these regulations applicable to bicycles shall apply whenever a bicycle is operated upon any highway or upon any bicycle path set aside for the preferential or exclusive use of bicycles subject to those exceptions stated herein." SECTION 6. Section 291C-143, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  [No] Except as otherwise provided in section 291C‑143.5, no bicycle shall be used to carry more persons at one time than the number for which it is designed and equipped." SECTION 7. Section 291C-143.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§291C-143.5[]] Low-speed electric bicycles[; operator age]. (a)  This section shall apply if a low-speed electric bicycle is operated upon any highway, street, roadway, or other designated public area set aside for the use of low‑speed electric bicycles. (b)  The counties by ordinance shall regulate operations of low-speed electric bicycles with regard to, but not limited to, the following: (1)  Operations in or upon roadways, bikeways, bicycle paths, and sidewalks; (2)  Storage and docking locations; (3)  Restrictions on maximum speed; (4)  Safety considerations; and (5)  Insurance requirements; provided that no ordinance adopted in accordance with this subsection shall be less restrictive than the requirements set forth in this part. (c)  No person under the age of fifteen shall operate a low-speed electric bicycle [as defined under title 15 United States Code section 2085.] on a highway, street, roadway, or any other public property in the State. (d)  No person shall operate a low-speed electric bicycle that is carrying any other person. (e)  No person other than the operator shall ride upon a low-speed electric bicycle. (f)  Any low-speed electric bicycle used from thirty minutes after sunset until thirty minutes before sunrise shall meet the specifications of, and requirements for, lamps and other equipment on bicycles as set forth in section 291C-147. (g)  No person shall operate a low-speed electric bicycle: (1)  At a speed other than is reasonable and prudent; provided that no person shall operate a low-speed electric bicycle at a speed greater than fifteen miles per hour; and (2)  Without having regard to the actual and potential hazards and conditions then existing. (h)  Any person who operates a low-speed electric bicycle recklessly in disregard for the safety of persons or property shall be assessed penalties as set forth in section 291C-161(b). (i)  In addition to any requirements provided under section 291C-150(b), each entity that provides low-speed electric bicycles for hire shall provide to each renter or lessee a copy of the low-speed electric bicycle ordinances or rules that have been adopted by the applicable county. (j)  Low-speed electric bicycles shall only be stored or docked at specific locations that shall be authorized by the counties." SECTION 8.  Section 291C-147, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  Every bicycle, except low-speed electric bicycles, shall be equipped with a red reflector at least four square inches in size [which] that shall be visible for six hundred feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps on a motor vehicle.  Every low-speed electric bicycle shall be equipped with a lighted lamp that is visible from the rear." SECTION 9. Section 291C-148, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (b) and (c) to read as follows: "(b)  [Unless] Except as otherwise provided in section 291C-143.5 or otherwise prohibited[,] by law, rule, or ordinance, a bicycle may be driven at a speed of ten miles per hour or less on a sidewalk or sidewalk area; provided that the driver of the bicycle shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian and that bicycle riding shall be prohibited on sidewalks in business districts. (c)  This section shall not be construed as preempting the director of transportation's or counties' authority to control parking on sidewalks under [section] sections 291C-114[.] and 291C-143.5.  Nor shall this section be construed as prohibiting the director or a county from authorizing parking on sidewalks when the authorization is promulgated in accordance with [section] sections 291C-114[.] or 291C-143.5." SECTION 10. Section 707-700, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "vulnerable user" to read as follows: ""Vulnerable user" means: (1)  A pedestrian legally within a street or public highway; (2)  A roadway worker actually engaged in work upon a street or public highway or in work upon utility facilities along a street or public highway, or engaged in the provision of emergency services within a street or public highway, including but not limited to: (a)  Construction and maintenance workers; and (b)  Police, fire, and other emergency responders; or (3)  A person legally operating any of the following within the street or public highway: (a)  A bicycle; (b)  A moped; (c)  An electric foot scooter; (d)  An electric personal assistive mobility device; [or] (e)  A wheelchair conveyance or other personal mobility device[.]; or (f)  A low-speed electric bicycle, as defined under title 15 United States Code section 2085." SECTION 11.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 12. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 13. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________